Utah statutes.
62A-4a-902.   Definitions.

(1) (a)  "Adoption assistance" means direct financial subsidies and support to adoptive parents of a child with special needs or whose need or condition has created a barrier that would prevent a successful adoption.

(b)  "Adoption assistance" may include state medical assistance, reimbursement of nonrecurring adoption expenses, or monthly subsidies.

(2)  "Child who has a special need" means a child who cannot or should not be returned to the home of his biological parents and who meets at least one of the following conditions:

(a)  the child is five years of age or older;

(b)  the child is under the age of 18 with a physical, emotional, or mental disability; or

(c)  the child is a member of a sibling group placed together for adoption.

(3)  "Monthly subsidy" means financial support to assist with the costs of adopting and caring for a child who has a special need.

(4)  "Nonrecurring adoption expenses" means reasonably necessary adoption fees, court costs, attorney's fees, and other expenses which are directly related to the legal adoption of a child who has a special need.

(5)  "State medical assistance" means the Medicaid program and medical assistance as defined in Subsections 26-18-2(4) and (5).

(6)  "Supplemental adoption assistance" means financial support for extraordinary, infrequent, or uncommon documented needs not otherwise covered by a monthly subsidy, state medical assistance, or other public benefits for which a child who has a special need is eligible.

